District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.50

Costs of training and employment.

(a)—(d)Repealed.

(e)

At the discretion of the Mayor and subject to annual appropriations, the Mayor may:

(1)

Provide supportive services necessary for a member of an assistance unit to participate in or prepare for a mandatory job search, job readiness, or other work activity under TANF or a mandatory self-sufficiency activity under POWER; and

(2)

Provide reimbursement for a recipient’s expenses directly related to participation in a mandatory work activity under TANF or a mandatory self-sufficiency activity under POWER.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 550, 29 DCR 1060
Sept. 10, 1985, D.C. Law 6-35, § 2(h), 32 DCR 3778
June 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-124, § 2(b), 33 DCR 2940
June 22, 1990, D.C. Law 8-144, § 2, 37 DCR 2974
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-202, § 2, 37 DCR 7937
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(p), 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(ll), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.50.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(m) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(p) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 701(p) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(m) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(oo) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(m) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(m) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(p) of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 701(p) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 701(p) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(m) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(oo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(oo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(oo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(oo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.